Wisconsin, session 2025, AB564.
do enact as follows:AB564,13Section 1. 118.25 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB564,2,24118.25 (1) (a) “Practitioner” means a person licensed as a physician, 5naturopathic doctor, chiropractor, or physician assistant in any state or licensed or 1certified as an advanced practice nurse prescriber in any state. In this paragraph, 2“physician” has the meaning given in s. 448.01 (5).AB564,2,33